Alaska statutes. Title 23. Labor and Workers’ Compensation.
Article 3. Alaska Wage and Hour Act.
Sec. 23.10.135.
Violations.

An employer violates AS

23.10.050

—

23.10.150

if the employer (1) hinders or delays the commissioner or an authorized representative of the commissioner in the performance of their duties in the enforcement of AS

23.10.050

—

23.10.150

; (2) refuses to admit the commissioner or an authorized representative to any place of employment; (3) fails to keep or falsifies a record required under the provisions of AS 23.10.050 — 23.10.150; (4) refuses to make a record accessible, or to furnish a sworn statement of the record, or to give information required for the enforcement of AS 23.10.050 — 23.10.150, upon demand, to the commissioner or an authorized representative; (5) fails to post an abstract of AS 23.10.050 — 23.10.150 as required by AS

23.10.105

; (6) discharges or in any other manner discriminates against an employee because the employee has filed a complaint, or has instituted or caused to be instituted any proceeding under or related to AS 23.10.050 — 23.10.150, or has testified or is about to testify in such a proceeding.

History.

(§ 9(1) ch 171 SLA 1959)

Sec. 23.10.140.
Penalty.

An employer who violates a provision of AS

23.10.050

—

23.10.150

, or of any regulation or order of the commissioner issued under it, upon conviction is punishable by a fine of not less than $100 nor more than $2,000, or by imprisonment for not less than 10 nor more than 90 days, or by both.
Each day a violation occurs constitutes a separate offense.

History.

(§ 9(2) ch 171 SLA 1959; am § 1 ch 113 SLA 1972)

Sec. 23.10.145.
Definitions.

If not defined in this title or in regulations adopted under this title, terms used in AS

23.10.050

—

23.10.150

shall be defined as they are defined in 29 U.S.C. 201 — 219 (Fair Labor Standards Act of 1938), as amended, or the regulations adopted under those sections.

History.

(§ 2(2) ch 171 SLA 1959; am § 4 ch 47 SLA 1983; am § 5 ch 90 SLA 2005)

Sec. 23.10.150.
Short title.

AS

23.10.050

—

23.10.150

may be cited as the Alaska Wage and Hour Act.

History.

(§ 1 ch 171 SLA 1959)

Secs. 23.10.155 — 23.10.320.
Equal pay for women, discrimination in employment, and age discrimination.
[Repealed, § 8 ch 117 SLA 1965, § 5 ch 125 SLA 1980.
For present provisions, see AS 18.80.220.]